Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1010
Body piercing, defined.

Body piercing means puncturing the skin of a person by aid of needles or other instruments designed or used to puncture the skin for the purpose of inserting removable jewelry or other objects through the human body, except that body piercing does not include puncturing the external part of the human earlobe.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-346.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 272.